Washington statutes.
RCW 18.185.210

Application of Consumer Protection Act.

Failure to fulfill the fiduciary duties and other duties as prescribed in RCW 18.185.100 is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business. A violation of RCW 18.185.100 is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce for the purpose of applying the Consumer Protection Act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 1993 c 260 s 22.]